Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4937.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 43528. (1) An individual shall not hunt bear unless the individual possesses a bear hunting license. However, an individual who goes on a bear hunt with a licensed hunter is not required to possess a bear hunting license if the individual does not carry a firearm, bow, or crossbow and does not own dogs used to chase or locate bear during the hunt. Beginning March 1, 2014, only Only an individual holding a valid base license is eligible to purchase a bear hunting license, pursuant to in accordance with current regulations. (2) The fee for a resident bear hunting license is $15.00. The fee for a nonresident bear hunting license is $150.00. Beginning March 1, 2014, the fee for a bear hunting license is $25.00. (3) The department may issue a kill tag with, or as a part of, a bear hunting license. The kill tag shall must bear the license number. The kill tag may also include space for other pertinent information required by the department. The kill tag, if issued, is part of the license. (4) In addition to the license fees in subsection (2), the department shall charge a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $4.00 for each individual who applies for a bear hunting license. Beginning March 1, 2014, in addition to the license fees in subsection (2), the department shall charge a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $5.00 for each individual who applies for a bear hunting license. (5) Beginning March 1, 2014, the The following individuals chasing or locating bear with dogs during the open season for that game and who hold a valid base license are eligible for the purchase of a bear participation license for a fee of $15.00: (a) Any individual possessing a firearm, crossbow, or bow and arrow. (b) The owner, when present, of any dog chasing or locating bear. (6) An individual holding a valid base license is eligible to purchase a bear backup hunting license, in accordance with current regulations. The fee for a resident bear backup license is $50.00. The fee for a nonresident bear backup license is $250.00. A bear backup hunting license allows the holder of that license to accompany a licensed bear hunter and do 1 of the following: (a) Shoot a bear being harvested from a tree if that bear has been wounded by the licensed hunter and the bear has not died when it reaches the ground. (b) Shoot a bear if that bear has been wounded by a licensed hunter at a bait site, has left the bait site, and requires tracking to locate the bear. (7) A backup bear hunting license does not allow the holder of that license to shoot a bear while the bear is crossing a state or county road. (8) A bear backup hunting license is subject to all of the following: (a) Is valid for the entire bear season. (b) Can be used an unlimited number of times to accompany an unlimited number of licensed hunters. (c) Is valid in all bear management units in this state.